Oklahoma, session 2025, SB381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1283, as

amended by Section 1, Chapter 299, O.S.L. 2022 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024,

Section 1283), is amended to read as follows:

Section 1283.

CONVICTED FELONS AND DELINQUENTS

A. Except as provided in subsection subsections B and C of this

section, it shall be unlawful for any person convicted of any felony

in any court of this state or of another state or of the United

States to have in his or her possession or under his or her

immediate control, or in any vehicle which the person is operating,

Req. No. 989 Page 1

or a t the residence where the convicted person resides, any pistol,

imitation or homemade pistol, altered air or toy pistol, machine

gun, sawed-off shotgun or sawed-off rifle, or any other firearm.

B. Any person who has previously been convicted of a nonviolent

felony in any court of this state or of another state or of the

United States, and who has received a full and complete pardon from

the proper authority and has not been convicted of any other felony

offense which has not been pardoned, shall have restored the right

to possess any firearm or other weapon prohibited by subsection A of

this section, the right to apply for and carry a handgun, concealed

or unconcealed, pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-

Defense Act or as otherwise permitted by law, and have the right to

perform the duties of a peace officer, gunsmith, and for firearms

repair any other profession that requires possession, carry, or

transportation of a firearm.

C. 1. Any person who:

a. has previously been convicted of a nonviolent felony,

and

b. has completed the entirety of the sentence imposed for

the offense and has had no additional misdemeanor or

felony convictions or charges pending for a period of

five (5) years since the completion of the sentence,

shall have restored the right to possess, carry, or transport any

non-semi-automatic firearm, may apply for and carry a handgun,

Req. No. 989 Page 2

conc ealed or unconcealed, pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma

Self-Defense Act or as otherwise permitted by law, and shall have

the right to perform any other duty that requires possession, carry,

or transportation of a firearm.

2. A person who has such rights restored pursuant to this

subsection shall have those rights forfeited upon conviction of a

subsequent misdemeanor or felony violation.

3. A person convicted of any of the following nonviolent felony

offenses shall not be eligible to have such rights restored as

provided for in this subsection:

a. child endangerment, as provided for in Section 852.1

of this title,

b. domestic abuse, domestic abuse of a pregnant woman,

domestic abuse in the presence of a child, or domestic

abuse resulting in great bodily injury, as provided

for in Section 644 of this title,

c. incest, as provided for in Section 885 of this title,

d. indecent exposure, as provided for in Section 1021 of

this title,

e. sexual assault, as provided for in Section 112 of this

title,

f. stalking, as provided for in Section 1173 of this

title,



Req. No. 989 Page 3

g. violations of a protective order, as provided for in

Section 1173 of this title and Section 60.6 of Title

22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or

h. violations of the Sex Offenders Registration Act, as

provided for in Sections 587, 590, and 590.1 of Title

57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

D. It shall be unlawful for any person serving a term of

probation for any felony in any court of this state or of another

state or of the United States or under the jurisdiction of any

alternative court program to have in his or her possession or under

his or her immediate control, or at his or her residence, or in any

passenger vehicle which the person is operating, any pistol,

shotgun, or rifle including any imitation or homemade pistol,

altered air or toy pistol, toy shotgun, or toy rifle, while such

person is subject to supervision, probation, parole, or inmate

status.

D. E. It shall be unlawful for any person previously

adjudicated as a delinquent child or a youthful offender for the

commission of an offense, which would have constituted a felony

offense if committed by an adult, to have in the possession of the

person or under the immediate control of the person, or have in any

vehicle which he or she is driving, or at the residence of the

person, any pistol, imitation or homemade pistol, altered air or toy

pistol, machine gun, sawed-off shotgun or sawed-off rifle, or any

Req. No. 989 Page 4

othe r dangerous or deadly firearm within ten (10) years after such

adjudication; provided, that nothing in this subsection shall be

construed to prohibit the placement of the person in a home with a

full-time duly appointed peace officer who is certified by the

Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET) pursuant

to the provisions of Section 3311 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma

Statutes.

E. F. It shall be unlawful for any person who is an alien

illegally or unlawfully in the United States to have in the

possession of the person or under the immediate control of the

person, or in any vehicle the person is operating, or at the

residence where the person resides, any pistol, imitation or

homemade pistol, altered air or toy pistol, shotgun, rifle, or any

other dangerous or deadly firearm; provided, that nothing in this

subsection applies to prohibit the transport or detention of the

person by law enforcement officers or federal immigration

authorities. Any person who violates the provisions of this

subsection shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor

punishable by a fine of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00).

F. G. Any person having been issued a handgun license pursuant

to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and who knowingly

or intentionally allows a convicted felon or adjudicated delinquent

or a youthful offender as prohibited by the provisions of subsection

A, C, D, or D E of this section to possess or have control of any

Req. No. 989 Page 5

fire arm authorized by the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall, upon

conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by a fine not to exceed

Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). In addition, the person shall

have the handgun license revoked by the Oklahoma State Bureau of

Investigation after a hearing and determination that the person has

violated the provisions of this section.

G. H. Any convicted or adjudicated person violating the

provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a

felony punishable as provided in Section 1284 of this title.

H. I. For purposes of this section, “sawed-off shotgun”:

1. “Sawed-off shotgun” or “sawed-off rifle” shall mean means

any shotgun or rifle of which the barrel or barrels have been

illegally shortened in length.

I. For purposes of this section, “altered toy pistol” shall

mean;

2. “Altered-toy pistol” means any toy weapon which has been

altered from its original manufactured state to resemble a real

weapon.

J. For purposes of this section, “altered air pistol” shall

mean;

3. “Altered air pistol” means any air pistol manufactured to

propel projectiles by air pressure which has been altered from its

original manufactured state.



Req. No. 989 Page 6

K. For purposes of this section, “alternative court program”

shall mean; and

4. “Alternative court program” means any drug court, Anna

McBride or mental health court, DUI court, or veterans court.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-989 CN 1/14/2025 3:50:46 PM



































Req. No. 989 Page 7